vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng chày & Bóng mềm > Găng đeo bảo vệ Bóng chày & Bóng mềm > Giáp ngực bóng chày & bóng mềm: Đệm bảo vệ ngực cho người bắt bóng; Đệm bảo vệ ngực cho trọng tài
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Baseball & Softball > Baseball & Softball Protective Gear > Baseball & Softball Chest Protectors: Catchers Chest Protectors; Umpire Chest Protectors
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Baseball og softball > Beskyttelsesutstyr for baseball og softball > Brystbeskyttere for baseball og softball: Brystbeskyttere for catchere; Brystbeskyttere for dommere
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baseball og softball > Beskyttelsesudstyr til baseball og softball > Brystbeskyttelse til baseball og softball: Brystbeskyttere til catchere; Brystbeskyttere til dommere
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 野球・ソフトボール用品 > 野球・ソフトボール用プロテクター > 野球・ソフトボール用胸部保護パット: キャッチャー用チェストプロテクター; 審判用チェストプロテクター
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 棒球/垒球用品 > 棒球/垒球护具 > 棒球/垒球胸/背护具: 捕手护胸; 裁判护胸
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Beisbolas ir softbolas > Beisbolo ir softbolo apsauginės priemonės > Beisbolo ir softbolo krūtinės apsaugos: Gaudytojų krūtinės apsaugos; Teisėjų krūtinės apsaugos
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Baseball och softball > Skyddsutrustning för baseball och softball > Baseball- och softballbröstskydd: Bröstskydd för catchers; Bröstskydd för domare
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Baseball e softball > Protezioni per baseball e softball > Protezioni per il petto per baseball e softball: Pettorine da ricevitore; Pettorine da arbitro
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Honkbal en softbal > Beschermende uitrusting voor honkbal en softbal > Borstbeschermers voor honkbal en softbal: Borstbeschermers voor catchers; Borstbeschermers voor scheidsrechters
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Base-ball et softball > Équipement de protection de base-ball et softball > Plastrons de receveurs: Plastrons de receveur; Plastrons d'arbitre
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 棒球和壘球 > 棒壘球護具 > 棒壘球護胸用具: 捕手護胸; 主審護胸
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Baseball a softball > Ochranné vybavení na baseball a softball > Chrániče hrudi na baseball a softball: Chrániče hrudi pro zadáky; Chrániče hrudi pro rozhodčí
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ > Προστατευτικά θώρακα μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ: Προστατευτικά στήθους catcher; Προστατευτικά στήθους διαιτητή
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Béisbol y sóftbol > Equipamiento protector para béisbol y sóftbol > Protectores de pecho para béisbol y sóftbol: Protectores de pecho para cácher; Protectores de pecho para árbitros
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бейсбол и софтбол > Защитная экипировка для бейсбола и софтбола > Нагрудники для бейсбола и софтбола: Защита груди для кэтчеров; Защита груди для ампайров
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basebol e softbol > Equipamento de proteção para basebol e softbol > Protetores de peito para basebol e softbol: Protetores de peito para recetores; Protetores de peito para árbitros
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Baseball in softball > Zaščitna oprema za baseball in softball > Ščitniki za prsni koš za baseball in softball: Ščitniki za prsi za lovilce; Ščitniki za prsni koš sodnika
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бейзбол и софтбол > Защитна екипировка за бейзбол и софтбол > Протектори за гръдния кош за бейзбол и софтбол: Протектори за гърди за кетчъри; Протектори за гърди на съдии
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Bejzbal a softbal > Baseballové a softbalové ochranné pomôcky > Bejzbalové a softbalové chrániče hrudníka: Chrániče hrudníka chytačov; Chrániče hrudníka pre rozhodcov
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Baseball ja softball > Baseball- ja softball-suojat > Baseball- ja softball-rintasuojukset: Siepparin rintasuojat; Tuomarin rintasuojat
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Baseball & Softball > Baseball- & Softball-Schutzkleidung > Baseball- & Softball-Brustpanzer: Brustschutz für Catcher; Umpire-Brustschutz
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Baseball és softball > Baseball és softball védőfelszerelés > Baseball és softball mellvédők: Elkapó mellvédők; Bírói mellvédők
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Beyzbol ve Softbol > Beyzbol ve Softbol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri > Beyzbol ve Softbol Göğüs Koruyucuları: Yakalayıcı göğüs korumaları; Hakem göğüs korumaları
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Beisebol e softbol > Equipamento de proteção para beisebol e softbol > Protetores peitorais para beisebol e softbol: Protetores de peito para catcher; Protetores de peito para árbitro
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 야구/소프트볼 > 야구/소프트볼 보호 장비 > 야구/소프트볼 가슴 보호대: 포수 가슴 보호대; 심판 가슴 보호대
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Baseball și softball > Echipament de protecție pentru baseball și softball > Protecții pentru piept pentru baseball și softball: Protecții de piept pentru catcher; Protectoare de piept pentru arbitri
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > ที่ป้องกันหน้าอกของเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล: เครื่องป้องกันหน้าอกแคชเชอร์; เครื่องป้องกันหน้าอกกรรมการ
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Baseball i softball > Odzież ochronna do baseballa i softballa > Ochraniacze tułowia do baseballa i softballa: Ochraniacze klatki piersiowej dla łapaczy; Ochraniacze klatki piersiowej dla sędziów
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Bejzbol i softbol > Zaštitna oprema za bejzbol i softbol > Štitnici za prsa za bejzbol i softbol: Štitnici za prsa za hvatače; Štitnici za prsa za suca